North Dakota, session 69, HB1538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 4.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Spay and neuter awareness grant program.
1. The commissioner shall create and administer a spay and neuter awareness grant
program through the environment and rangeland protection fund.
2. The commissioner shall award grants to applicants engaging in:
a. Promoting the use of spaying and neutering services in the state; and
b. Offering and performing spaying and neutering services in the state.
3. In consultation with the state veterinarian, the commissioner shall adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 28 - 32 to implement the provisions of this section .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-41-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-41-19. Deposit of fees.
The commissioner shall forward all inspection fees, license fees, and registration fees
received under this chapter to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall deposit the first
seven hundred twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ofrevenue received from fees
received under this chapter each biennium in the environment and rangeland protection fund
and any remaining fees in the general fund.
Page No. 1 25.1135.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - AGRICULTURE COMMISSIONER - SPAY AND NEUTER
AWARENESS GRANT PROGRAM - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the environment and rangeland protection fund in the state treasury, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $1,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
agriculture commissioner for the purpose of creating and administering the spay and neuter
awareness grant program under section 1 of this Act, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027. The funding provided in this section is considered a one-time
funding item.
Page No. 2 25.1135.01000